Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 57.
INTANGIBLE PERSONAL PROPERTY.

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment was proposed by S.J.R. No. 4 (see Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), p. 3035) and filed in the office of the Secretary of State on Jan. 29, 1976. It was approved at the general election on Nov. 7, 1976, by a vote of 634,231 for and 93,277 against.

Cross References.

Taxation according to value, Ark. Const., Art. 16, § 5.

§ 1. Intangible personal property — Assessment and taxation.

The General Assembly may classify intangible personal property for assessment at lower percentages of value than other property and may exempt one or more classes of intangible personal property from taxation, or may provide for the taxation of intangible personal property on a basis other than ad valorem.

§ 2. Effect on other constitutional provisions.

The provisions of this Amendment shall be in lieu of those provisions of Article 16, Section 5 of the Constitution of the State of Arkansas relating to the assessment and taxation of intangible personal property.

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const., Art. 16, § 5, as originally enacted, was repealed and replaced by Ark. Const. Amend. 59.